ani_demonstratives.lexd
LEXICON PronounsDemOblStem
гьоб<PRON>:гьо                                               # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><m>:гьово                                        # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><f>:гьойо                                        # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><an><sg>:гьобо                                    # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><an><pl>:гьойо                                    # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><inan1>:гьобо                                    # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><inan2>:гьоро                                    # proximal
гьоноб<PRON>:гьоно                                           # proximal
гьеб<PRON>:гье                                               # medial
гьебеб<PRON><m>:гьеве                                        # medial
гьебеб<PRON><f>:гьейе                                        # medial
гьебеб<PRON><an><sg>:гьебе                                    # medial
гьебеб<PRON><an><pl>:гьейе                                    # medial
гьебеб<PRON><inan1>:гьебе                                    # medial
гьебеб<PRON><inan2>:гьере                                    # medial
гьенеб<PRON>:гьене                                           # medial
гьедеб<PRON>:гьеде                                           # distal
гьегеб<PRON>><lower>:гье>ге                                  # distal
гьелъеб<PRON>><upper>:гье>лъе                                # distal
гьендеб<PRON>:гьенде                                         # distal
гьенедеб<PRON>:гьенеде                                       # distal
гьундеб<PRON>:гьунде                                         # distal
гьунгоб<PRON>><lower>:гьун>го                                # distal
гьунлъоб<PRON>><upper>:гьун>лъо                              # distal
гьунудоб<PRON>:гьунудо                                       # distal
гьунугоб<PRON>><lower>:гьуну>го                              # distal
гьунулъоб<PRON>><upper>:гьуну>лъо                            # distal
гьидиб<PRON>:гьиди                                           # distal
гьигиб<PRON>><lower>:гьи>ги                                  # distal
гьилъиб<PRON>><upper>:гьи>лъи                                # distal
гьиндиб<PRON>:гьинди                                         # distal
гьингиб<PRON>><lower>:гьин>ги                                # distal
гьинлъиб<PRON>><upper>:гьин>лъи                              # distal
гьинидиб<PRON>:гьиниди                                       # distal
гьинигиб<PRON>><lower>:гьини>ги                              # distal
гьинилъиб<PRON>><upper>:гьини>лъи                            # distal

LEXICON Inflection
<gen>:лIи[f]
<gen><pl>:лI>ол[f]
<dat>:лъу[n.m.sg]
<erg>:ди
<dat>:й[vowel_morpheme]
<gen><m>:в[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><f>:й[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><sg>:б[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><pl>:й[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan1>:б[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan2>:р[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><m>><pl>:в>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><f>><pl>:й>ил[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><pl>><pl>:й>ил[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan1>><pl>:б>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan2>><pl>:р>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<aff><m>:во[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><f>:йо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><an><sg>:бо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><an><pl>:йо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><inan1>:бо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><inan2>:ро[vowel_morpheme]
<sub><ess>:кьи
<sub><lat>:кьи
<sub>><el>:кьи>кку
<super><ess>:ъа
<super><lat>:ъо
<super>><el>:ъа>кку
<in><ess>:ла
<in><lat>:ди
<in>><el>:ла>кку
<inter><ess>:лIи
<inter><lat>:лIи
<inter>><el>:лIи>кку
<ad><ess>:ха
<ad><lat>:хо
<ad>><el>:хо>кку
<apud><ess>:хъи
<apud><lat>:хъи
<apud>><el>:хъи>кку
<cont><ess>:чIу
<cont><lat>:чIу
<cont>><el>:чIу>кку
